Missouri, session 2026, HB2392.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.3475, to read as follows:
407.3475. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be referred
to as the "Missouri Social Media Safety for Minors Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Account holder", a natural person who creates, maintains, or accesses an
account on a social media platform;
(2) "Age verification", a commercially reasonable method of confirming the age
of an account applicant consistent with industry standards and privacy protections;
(3) "Minor", a person under eighteen years of age;
(4) "Social media platform", an online service that allows users to create
accounts, create or view user-generated content, interact socially, and use
algorithmically curated feeds. The term "social media platform" does not include:
(a) Services primarily used for email, direct messaging, or business
collaboration;
(b) Educational platforms used by schools; and
(c) Online video gaming services with integrated chat where social interaction is
incidental;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2392 2
(5) "Verified parent or guardian", a person with legal custody of a minor,
verified through the procedures required under this section.
3. No social media platform shall permit a person under fourteen years of age to
create or maintain an account.
4. A minor fourteen years of age and under sixteen years of age may hold an
account only with the verified consent of a parent or legal guardian.
5. Social media platforms may allow account creation but shall provide parents
or guardians the option to:
(1) Access and review account activity;
(2) Request deletion of the minor's account; and
(3) Limit messaging features between the minor and unverified adult accounts.
6. A social media platform shall implement a secure age-verification process for
all Missouri users prior to account creation.
7. Age-verification data shall not be retained by the social media platform
beyond what is strictly necessary for compliance with the provisions of this section.
8. Social media platforms shall use age verification techniques that:
(1) Do not require minors to provide government-issued identification directly to
the social media platform;
(2) Protect user privacy; and
(3) Are independently certifiable as compliant with standards for data
minimization and security.
9. A social media platform shall immediately terminate any account determined
to belong to a person under fourteen years of age.
10. A verified parent or guardian may request deletion of a minor's account and
the social media platform shall comply within ten business days of such request. Social
media platforms shall provide a simple, accessible process for parents or guardians to
make such requests.
11. A social media platform shall not:
(1) Use addictive or manipulative design features specifically targeting minors,
including infinite-scroll mechanisms or auto-playing content without time-limit
controls;
(2) Permit direct messaging from adults to minors unless the adult is a verified
contact; or
(3) Serve targeted advertising to minors based on personal data or behavioral
profiling.
12. A violation of this section constitutes an unlawful merchandising practice
under chapter 407. The attorney general may enforce the provisions of this section and

HB 2392 3
seek civil penalties of up to fifty thousand dollars per violation, plus injunctive relief and
attorney fees. A parent or legal guardian of a minor harmed by a violation may bring a
civil action for damages.
✔